Washington statutes.
RCW 11.62.020

Effect of affidavit and proof of death—Discharge and release of transferor—Refusal to pay or deliver—Procedure—False affidavit—Conflicting affidavits—Accountability.

The person paying, delivering, transferring, or issuing personal property pursuant to RCW 11.62.010 is discharged and released to the same extent as if such person has dealt with a personal representative of the decedent, unless at the time of such payment, delivery, transfer, or issuance, such person had actual knowledge of the falsity of any statement which is required by RCW 11.62.010(2) as now or hereafter amended to be contained in the successor's affidavit. Such person is not required to see to the application of the personal property, or to inquire into the truth of any matter specified in RCW 11.62.010 (1) or (2), or into the payment of any estate tax liability.

An organization shall not be deemed to have actual knowledge of the falsity of any statement contained in an affidavit made pursuant to RCW 11.62.010(2) as now or hereafter amended until such time as said knowledge shall have been brought to the personal attention of the individual making the transfer, delivery, payment, or issuance of the personal property claimed under RCW 11.62.010 as now or hereafter amended.

If any person to whom an affidavit and proof of death is delivered refuses to pay, deliver, or transfer any personal property, it may be recovered or its payment, delivery, transfer, or issuance compelled upon proof of their right in a proceeding brought for the purpose by or on behalf of the persons entitled thereto. If more than one affidavit is delivered with reference to the same personal property, the person to whom an affidavit is delivered may pay, deliver, transfer, or issue any personal property in response to the first affidavit received, provided that proof of death has also been received, or alternately implead such property into court for payment over to the person entitled thereto. Any person to whom payment, delivery, transfer, or issuance of personal property is made pursuant to RCW 11.62.010 as now or hereafter amended is answerable and accountable therefor to any personal representative of the estate of the decedent or to any other person having a superior right thereto.

[ 1990 c 180 s 4; 1977 ex.s. c 234 s 12; 1974 ex.s. c 117 s 5.]

NOTES:

Application, effective date—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 234: See notes following RCW 11.20.020.

Application, construction—Severability—Effective date—1974 ex.s. c 117: See RCW 11.02.080 and notes following.